Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-308
Removal of traffic hazards; determined by Department of Transportation and local authority; violation; penalty.

It shall be the duty of the owner of real property to remove from such property any tree, plant, shrub, or other obstruction, or part thereof, which, by obstructing the view of any driver, constitutes a traffic hazard. When the Department of Transportation or any local authority determines upon the basis of engineering and traffic investigation that such a traffic hazard exists, it shall notify the owner and order that the hazard be removed within ten days. Failure of the owner to remove such traffic hazard within ten days shall constitute a Class V misdemeanor, and every day such owner fails to remove it shall be a separate offense.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 101;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,101;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 32;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 107.